Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 4. Standard Nonforfeiture Law for Individual Deferred Annuities

§ 26-16-401.
Short title.

This article is known as the “Standard Nonforfeiture Law For Individual Deferred Annuities”.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 121, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-16-133; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-16-402.
Applicability of article.

This article does not apply to any:

Reinsurance;

Group annuity purchased under a retirement plan or plan of deferred compensation established or maintained by an employer, an employee organization, or both, other than a plan providing individual retirement accounts or annuities under Section 408 of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. § 408];

Premium deposit fund;

Variable annuity;

Investment annuity;

Immediate annuity;

Deferred annuity contract after annuity payments have commenced;

Reversionary annuity; or

Contract which is delivered outside this state through an agent or other representative of the company issuing the contract.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 121, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-16-133; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Section 408 of the Internal Revenue Code, referred to in subsection (a)(ii), appears as 26 U.S.C. § 408.

§ 26-16-403.
Contract provisions.

In the case of contracts issued on or after the operative date of this article as defined in W.S.

26-16-411

, no annuity contract, except as stated in W.S.

26-16-402

, shall be delivered or issued for delivery in this state unless it contains in substance the following provisions, or corresponding provisions which the commissioner determines are at least as favorable to the contract holder, upon cessation of payment of considerations under the contract or upon the written request of the contract owner:

The company shall grant a paid-up annuity benefit on a plan stipulated in the contract of a value as is specified in W.S.

26-16-405

through

26-16-409

;

If a contract provides for a lump sum settlement at maturity, or at any other time, that upon surrender of the contract at or prior to the commencement of any annuity payments, the company shall pay instead of any paid-up annuity benefit a cash surrender benefit in an amount as is specified in W.S.

26-16-405

,

26-16-406

,

26-16-408

and

26-16-409

, provided the company may reserve the right to defer the payment of the cash surrender benefit for a period not to exceed six (6) months after demand therefore with surrender of the contract and after making written request and receiving the written approval of the commissioner. The request shall address the necessity and equitability to all policyholders of the deferral;

A statement of the mortality table and interest rates used in calculating any minimum paid-up annuity, cash surrender or death benefits that are guaranteed under the contract, together with sufficient information to determine the amounts of those benefits;

A statement that any paid-up annuity, cash surrender or death benefits available under the contract are not less than the minimum benefits required by any statute of the state in which the contract is delivered and an explanation of the manner in which the benefits are altered by the existence of any additional amounts the company credits to the contract, any indebtedness to the company on the contract or any prior withdrawals from or partial surrenders of the contract;

Any contract which does not provide cash surrender benefits or does not provide death benefits at least equal to the minimum nonforfeiture amount prior to the commencement of any annuity payments shall include a statement in a prominent place in the contract that those benefits are not provided;

Notwithstanding the requirements of this section, any deferred annuity contract may provide that if no considerations are received under a contract for a period of two (2) full years and the portion of the paid-up annuity benefit at maturity on the plan stipulated in the contract arising from considerations paid prior to the period would be less than twenty dollars ($20.00) monthly, the company, at its option, may terminate the contract by payment in cash of the then present value of the portion of the paid-up annuity benefit, calculated on the basis of the mortality table and interest rate specified in the contract for determining the paid-up annuity benefit, and by that payment is relieved of any further obligation under the contract.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 121, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-16-133; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2006, ch. 6, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, in the introductory language of (a), inserted “as defined in W.S.

26-16-411

” near the beginning and added “or upon the written request of the contract owner” at the end; rewrote (a)(ii), substituting “not to exceed six” for “of six,” added “and after making written request and receiving the written approval of the commissioner” at the end of the first sentence, and added the last sentence.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Pursuant to Laws 2006, ch. 6, § 3, the requirements of this act shall apply only to annuity contracts delivered or issued for delivery in this state on or after July 1, 2006.

§ 26-16-404.
Minimum nonforfeiture amounts upon which certain minimum values are to be based.

The minimum values as specified in W.S.

26-16-405

through

26-16-409

of any paid-up annuity, cash surrender or death benefits available under an annuity contract shall be based upon minimum nonforfeiture amounts as defined in subsections (b) through (f) of this section.

The minimum nonforfeiture amounts shall be governed by the following:

The minimum nonforfeiture amount at any time at or prior to the commencement of any annuity payments shall be equal to an accumulation up to that time at rates of interest as provided in subsection (e) of this section of the net considerations paid prior to that time decreased by the sum of any prior withdrawals from or partial surrenders of the contract accumulated at rates of interest provided in subsection (e) of this section, an annual contract charge of fifty dollars ($50.00), accumulated at rates of interest as provided in subsection (e) of this section, and any premium tax paid by the company for the contract, accumulated at rates of interest as provided in subsection (e) of this section, and the amount of any indebtedness to the company on the contract, including interest due and accrued. The net considerations for a given contract year used to define the minimum nonforfeiture amount shall be an amount equal to eighty-seven and one-half percent (87 1/2%) of the gross considerations credited to the contract during that contract year;

For contracts issued on or after July 1, 2003, and before July 1, 2007, the provisions of paragraph (i) of this subsection apply, except that the minimum nonforfeiture amount shall be based upon a rate of interest of one and one-half percent (1.5%) per annum.

and (d) Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 6, § 2.

The interest rate used in determining minimum nonforfeiture amounts shall be an annual rate of interest determined as follows:

The lesser of three percent (3%) per annum and the following, which shall be specified in the contract if the interest rate will be reset:

The five (5) year constant maturity treasury rate reported by the federal reserve as of a date, or average over a period, rounded to the nearest one-twentieth of one percent (.05%), specified in the contract no longer than fifteen (15) months prior to the contract issue date or redetermination date under paragraph (iii) of this subsection;

Reduced by one hundred twenty-five (125) basis points.

Notwithstanding paragraph (i) of this subsection, the resulting interest rate shall not be less than fifteen one-hundredths of one percent (0.15%);

The interest rate shall apply for an initial period and may be redetermined for additional periods. The redetermination date, basis and period, if any, shall be stated in the contract. The basis is the date or average over a specified period that produces the value of the five (5) year constant maturity treasury rate to be used at each redetermination date.

During the period or term that a contract provides substantive participation in an equity indexed benefit, it may increase the reduction described in subparagraph (e)(i)(B) of this section by up to an additional one hundred (100) basis points to reflect the value of the equity index benefit. The present value at the contract issue date, and at each redetermination date thereafter, of the additional reduction shall not exceed the market value of the benefit. The commissioner may require a demonstration that the present value of the additional reduction does not exceed the market value of the benefit. Lacking such a demonstration that is acceptable to the commissioner, the commissioner may disallow or limit the additional reduction.

The commissioner may adopt rules to implement the provisions of subsection (f) of this section and to provide for further adjustments to the calculation of minimum nonforfeiture amounts for contracts that provide substantive participation in an equity index benefit and for other contracts that the commissioner determines are justified.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 121, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-16-133; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2003, ch. 35, § 1; 2006, ch. 6, §§ 1, 2; 2022 ch. 38, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, substituted “f” for “d” in (a); rewrote (b), in part by adding the proviso in (i); added (e), (f) and (g); repealed former (c) and (d), which concerned contracts providing for fixed scheduled consideration and for single consideration; and made stylistic and related changes.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “fifteen one-hundredths of one percent (0.15%)” for “one percent (1%)” in (e)(ii).

Editor's notes. —

Pursuant to Laws 2006, ch. 6, § 3, the requirements of this act shall apply only to annuity contracts delivered or issued for delivery in this state on or after July 1, 2006.

§ 26-16-405.
Present value of paid-up annuity benefits.

Any paid-up annuity benefit available under a contract shall be such that its present value on the date annuity payments are to commence is at least equal to the minimum nonforfeiture amount on that date. The present value shall be computed using the mortality table and the interest rate specified in the contract for determining the minimum paid-up annuity benefits guaranteed in the contract.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 121, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-16-133; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-16-406.
Calculating cash surrender benefits available prior to contract maturity.

For contracts which provide cash surrender benefits, cash surrender benefits available prior to maturity shall not be less than an amount determined as follows:

Determine the present value as of the date of surrender of that portion of the maturity value of the paid-up annuity benefit which would be provided under the contract at maturity, arising from considerations paid prior to the time of cash surrender;

The amount determined in paragraph (i) of this subsection shall be reduced by the amount appropriate to reflect any prior withdrawals from or partial surrenders of the contract with the present value being calculated on the basis of an interest rate not more than one percent (1%) higher than the interest rate specified in the contract for accumulating the net considerations to determine the maturity value;

The amount determined in paragraph (ii) of this subsection shall be decreased by the amount of any indebtedness to the company on the contract, including interest due and accrued; and

The amount determined in paragraph (iii) of this subsection shall be increased by any existing additional amounts credited by the company to the contract. In no case shall any cash surrender benefit be less than the minimum nonforfeiture amount at that time. The death benefit under the contracts shall be at least equal to the cash surrender benefit.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 121, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-16-133; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-16-407.
Minimum paid-up annuity benefit available as a nonforfeiture option.

For contracts which do not provide cash surrender benefits, the present value of any paid-up annuity benefit available as a nonforfeiture option at any time prior to maturity shall not be less than the present value of that portion of the maturity value of the paid-up annuity benefit provided under the contract arising from considerations paid prior to the time the contract is surrendered in exchange for, or changed to, a deferred paid-up annuity, with the present value being calculated for the period prior to the maturity date on the basis of the interest rate specified in the contract for accumulating the net considerations to determine the maturity value, and increased by any existing additional amounts credited by the company to the contract. For contracts which do not provide any death benefits prior to the commencement of any annuity payments, the present values shall be calculated on the basis of the interest rate and the mortality table specified in the contract for determining the maturity value of the paid-up annuity benefit. The present value of a paid-up annuity benefit shall not be less than the minimum nonforfeiture amount at that time.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 121, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-16-133; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-16-408.
Annuity contract optional maturity dates.

For the purpose of determining the benefits calculated under W.S.

26-16-406

and

26-16-407

in the case of annuity contracts under which an election may be made to have annuity payments commence at optional maturity dates, the maturity date is the latest date for which election is permitted by the contract, but not later than the anniversary of the contract immediately following the annuitant’s seventieth birthday or the tenth anniversary of the contract, whichever is later.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 121, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-16-133; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-16-409.
Calculating benefits under contracts with fixed schedule considerations.

Any paid-up annuity, cash surrender or death benefits available at any time, other than on the contract anniversary, under any contract with fixed scheduled considerations, shall be calculated with allowance for the lapse of time and the payment of any scheduled considerations beyond the beginning of the contract year in which cessation of payment of considerations under the contract occurs.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 121, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-16-133; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-16-410.
Calculating minimum annuity and life insurance nonforfeiture benefits when included by rider or supplemental contract provision.

For any contract which provides therein, by rider or supplemental contract provision, both annuity benefits and life insurance benefits that exceed the greater of cash surrender benefits or a return of the gross considerations with interest, the minimum nonforfeiture benefits shall be equal to the sum of the minimum nonforfeiture benefits for the annuity portion and the minimum nonforfeiture benefits, if any, for the life insurance portion computed as if each portion were a separate contract. Notwithstanding W.S.

26-16-405

through

26-16-409

additional benefits payable in case of total and permanent disability, as reversionary annuity or deferred reversionary annuity benefits or as other policy benefits additional to life insurance, endowment and annuity benefits, and considerations for all those additional benefits, shall be disregarded in ascertaining the minimum nonforfeiture amounts, paid-up annuity, cash surrender and death benefits required by this article. The inclusion of the additional benefits is not required in any paid-up benefits, unless the additional benefits separately would require minimum nonforfeiture amounts, paid-up annuity, cash surrender and death benefits.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 121, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-16-133; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-16-411.
Operative date of article.

After May 20, 1981, any company may file with the commissioner a written notice of its election to comply with this article after a specified date before May 20, 1983. After filing the notice, then upon the specified date, which is the operative date of this article for that company, this article is operative with respect to annuity contracts thereafter issued by that company. If a company does not make an election, the operative date of this article for that company is May 20, 1983.

Beginning July 1, 2006, any company may elect to apply the provisions of this article on a contract form by contract form basis to all annuity contracts thereafter issued.

On or after July 1, 2007, this article is operative with respect to all annuity contracts thereafter issued.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 121, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-16-133; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2006, ch. 6, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, added (b) and (c), and made a related change.

Editor's notes. —

Pursuant to Laws 2006, ch. 6, § 3, the requirements of this act shall apply only to annuity contracts delivered or issued for delivery in this state on or after July 1, 2006.